Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 2. Jurisdiction of Court Concerning Trusts; Choice of Law; Venue; Situs.

Sec. 13.36.035.
Court jurisdiction; choice of law.

The court has exclusive jurisdiction of proceedings initiated by interested parties concerning the internal affairs of trusts, including trusts covered by (c) of this section. Except as provided in (c) and (d) of this section, proceedings that may be maintained under this section are those concerning the administration and distribution of trusts, the declaration of rights, and the determination of other matters involving trustees and beneficiaries of trusts. These include proceedings to

appoint or remove a trustee under AS

13.36.076

;

review trustees’ fees and to review and settle interim or final accounts;

ascertain beneficiaries, determine any question arising in the administration or distribution of any trust including questions of construction of trust instruments, instruct trustees, and determine the existence or nonexistence of any immunity, power, privilege, duty, or right; and

release registration of a trust.

Neither registration of a trust nor a proceeding under this section results in continuing supervisory proceedings. The management and distribution of a trust estate, submission of accounts and reports to beneficiaries, payment of trustee’s fees and other obligations of a trust, acceptance and change of trusteeship, and other aspects of the administration of a trust shall proceed expeditiously consistently with the terms of the trust, free of judicial intervention and without order, approval, or other action of any court, subject to the jurisdiction of the court as invoked by interested parties or as otherwise exercised as provided by law.

A provision that the laws of this state govern the validity, construction, and administration of the trust and that the trust is subject to the jurisdiction of this state is valid, effective, and conclusive for the trust if

some or all of the trust assets are deposited in this state and are being administered by a qualified person; in this paragraph, “deposited in this state” includes being held in a checking account, time deposit, certificate of deposit, brokerage account, trust company fiduciary account, or other similar account or deposit that is located in this state;

a trustee is a qualified person who is designated as a trustee under the governing instrument or by a court having jurisdiction over the trust;

the powers of the trustee identified under (2) of this subsection include or are limited to

maintaining records for the trust on an exclusive basis or a nonexclusive basis; and

preparing or arranging for the preparation of, on an exclusive basis or a nonexclusive basis, an income tax return that must be filed by the trust; and

part or all of the administration occurs in this state, including physically maintaining trust records in this state.

The validity, construction, and administration of a trust with a state jurisdiction provision are determined by the laws of this state, including the

capacity of the settlor;

powers, obligations, liabilities, and rights of the trustees and the appointment and removal of the trustees under AS

13.36.076

; and

existence and extent of powers, conferred or retained, including a trustee’s discretionary powers, the powers retained by a beneficiary of the trust, and the validity of the exercise of a power.

[Repealed, § 22 ch 105 SLA 1998.]

Unless the laws of this state govern the validity, construction, and administration of the trust under (c) of this section, the laws of this state govern the administration of a trust and the courts of this state have exclusive jurisdiction over the trust and its trustees while the trust is administered in this state unless the governing instrument of the trust

specifies that the law of a jurisdiction other than this state governs the administration of the trust;

expressly prohibits a change in the choice of law for the administration of the trust; and

expressly states that a change in the choice of law for the administration of the trust may not occur, even if a trustee from another jurisdiction becomes a trustee of the trust.

In (f) of this section, a trust is considered to be administered in this state if

the governing instrument of the trust specifies that the trust is to be administered in this state;

the principal office of the trustee having custody of the trust’s principal assets and records is located in this state, unless the trustee elects to maintain the administration of the trust in the state whose law is specified in the governing instrument to govern;

the only trustee who is acting to administer the trust is a qualified person, unless the trustee elects to maintain the administration of the trust in the state whose law is specified in the governing instrument to govern;

a majority of all trustees acting to administer the trust consists of qualified persons, unless a majority of the trustees elects to maintain the administration of the trust in the state whose law is specified in the governing instrument to govern; or

a majority of the trustees are not qualified persons and a majority of the trustees, including at least one trustee who is a qualified person, executes an acknowledged instrument that this state shall be the primary place of administration for the trust.

The trustee shall make the election in (g)(2) — (4) of this section by an instrument that is acknowledged and filed in a court of the state whose law is specified in the governing instrument to govern.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am §§ 2, 3 ch 6 SLA 1997; am § 22 ch 105 SLA 1998; am §§ 3, 4 ch 7 SLA 2008; am § 1 ch 10 SLA 2014)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 21, 2014, added (f), (g), and (h).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 9, ch. 6, SLA 1997 provides that the 1997 amendments to this section do “not apply to a trust unless the trust is created on or after April 2, 1997.”

Section 17, ch. 7, SLA 2008 provides that the 2008 amendments of (a) and (d) of this section apply “to trusts in existence on and after March 28, 2008.”

Sec. 13.36.040.
Trust proceedings; venue.

Venue for proceedings under AS

13.36.035

involving registered trusts is in the place of registration.
Venue for proceedings under AS

13.36.035

involving trusts not registered in this state is in any place where the trust properly could have been registered, and otherwise by the rules of civil procedure.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.36.043.
Change of situs to Alaska.

The situs of a foreign trust is moved to this state when the trust satisfies the conditions listed in AS

13.36.035(c)(1)

— (4) and a qualified person serving as trustee registers the trust under AS

13.36.010

.

If the situs of a foreign trust is moved to this state as provided in this section, a provision in the trust that restricts the transfer of trust assets in a manner similar to AS

34.40.110

, that allows the trust to be perpetual, or that is not expressly prohibited by the law of this state is effective and enforceable under the laws of this state.

A foreign trust that moves its situs to this state is valid whether or not the trust complied with the laws of this state at the time of its creation or after its creation.

In this section, “foreign trust” means a trust that is created in another state or country and that is valid in that state or country.

History.

(§ 9 ch 105 SLA 1998; am § 3 ch 82 SLA 2004)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 25, ch. 105, SLA 1998 provides that this section applies “only to

“(1) testamentary trusts created by wills, or codicils, of persons dying on or after September 15, 1998 regardless of when the trusts and codicils are executed;

“(2) nontestamentary trusts created on or after September 15, 1998; and

“(3) testamentary or nontestamentary trusts that are registered or reregistered after September 15, 1998 if the registrations state that the trusts will be governed by this Act.”

Sec. 13.36.045.
Trust proceedings; matters relating to foreign trusts.

The court will not, over the objection of a party, entertain proceedings under AS

13.36.035

involving a trust registered or having its principal place of administration in another state, unless

all appropriate parties could not be bound by litigation in the courts of the state where the trust is registered or has its principal place of administration;

the interests of justice otherwise would seriously be impaired; or

the trust satisfies AS

13.36.035

(c).

The court may condition a stay or dismissal of a proceeding under this section on any party’s consent to jurisdiction of the state in which the trust is registered or has its principal place of business, or the court may grant a continuance or enter any other appropriate order.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 4 ch 6 SLA 1997)

Sec. 13.36.050.
Concurrent jurisdiction; venue.

The court of the place in which the trust is registered has concurrent jurisdiction with other courts of this state of actions and proceedings to determine the existence or nonexistence of trusts created other than by will, of actions by or against creditors or debtors of trusts, and of other actions and proceedings involving trustees and third parties. Venue is determined by the rules generally applicable to civil actions.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.36.055.
Proceedings for review of employment of agents and review of compensation of trustee and employees of trust.

On petition of an interested person, after notice to all interested persons, the court may review the propriety of employment of any person by a trustee including any attorney, auditor, investment advisor or other specialized agent or assistant, and the reasonableness of the compensation of any person so employed, and the reasonableness of the compensation determined by the trustee for the trustee’s services. Any person who has received excessive compensation from a trust may be ordered to make appropriate refunds.

If the terms of a trust do not specify the compensation or method for determining the compensation of the trustee, the trustee is entitled to compensation that is reasonable under the circumstances. If the terms of a trust do not specify the compensation or method for determining the compensation of a person employed by the trustee, the person employed by the trustee is entitled to compensation that is reasonable under the circumstances. If the terms of a trust specify the compensation or method for determining the compensation of a trustee and if the trustee is compensated according to these terms, the compensation paid to the trustee is presumed to be reasonable. If the terms of a trust specify the compensation or method for determining the compensation of a person employed by the trustee and if the person employed by the trustee is compensated according to these terms, the compensation paid to the person employed by the trustee is presumed to be reasonable. If a trust specifies the compensation or method for determining the compensation paid to the trustee or person employed by the trustee and if the trustee or person employed by the trustee is compensated accordingly, an interested person who seeks review of the compensation has the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that the compensation paid to the trustee or the person employed by the trustee is not reasonable.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 5 ch 7 SLA 2008)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 17, ch. 7, SLA 2008 provides that (b) of this section applies “to trusts in existence on and after March 28, 2008.”

Sec. 13.36.060.
Trust proceedings; initiation by notice; necessary parties.

Proceedings under AS

13.36.035

are initiated by filing a petition in the court and giving notice under AS

13.06.110

to interested parties.
The court may order notification of additional persons.
A decree is valid as to all who are given notice of the proceeding though fewer than all interested parties are notified.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)